src/tobar-lex.txt
!****************************************************************************
! Tobar - ac Grianna
!
! E. Uí Dhonnchadha
! Jan 2009
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! Feb 2014 RIA Corpus II
!****************************************************************************

Multichar_Symbols

+Noun +Com +Gen +Dat +Sg +Pl +Masc +Fem +DefArt +Emph +Subst
+Pron +Prep +Pers +Cmpd +Simp
+Det +Dem +Q +Def +Qty
+Adj +Base
+Adv +Dir
+Cop +Pres +Past
+Art +Def
+Conj +Coord +Subord

+Verbal
+Verb
+VT +VI +VTI	! transitive, intrans., both trans & intrans
+1P +2P +3P 	! First, second and third person
+Auto		! Autonomous 
+Vow

+Sg +Pl		! Singular and Plural

		!- Indicative Mood - Modh Táscach 
+PresInd	! Present Indicative
+PastInd	! Past Indicative
+FutInd		! Future Indicative

		! Imperfect Indicative

+PastImp	! Gháthchaite Past Habitual (Imperfect Indicative)
+PresImp	! Gháthláithreach Pres Habitual (Verb bí only)

		!- Conditional Mood - 
+Cond		! 

		!- Subjunctive Mood - Modh Foshuiteach
+PresSubj	! Present Subjunctive
+PastSubj	! Past Subjunctive

		!- Imperative  Mood - Modh Ordaitheach
+Imper		! 

+Rel		! relative forms - direct
+RelInd		! rel. indirect

+Dep		! dependant forms
+Neg
+Q
+NegQ

+Cop		! Copula
+Pres		! copula present & future
+Past		! copula past & conditional

+VF		! - form used before a word starting with a vowel or f+vowel 
+Pro		! - copula - sea
+Emph		! - emphatic forms
+CM		! Canúint na Mumhan
+CC		! Canúint Chonnachta
+CU		! Canúint Uladh

+Len
+Ecl

^Verb
^Sé
^Urú
^VN		! verbal noun
^hv
!--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
^Verb
!--------------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON Root
        Tobar;

LEXICON Tobar

abair+Verb+VTI+Vow+PastImp:adeireadh		#;

! IS (Copula)
is_ea+Cop+Pres+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg:is_ea	#;	! is ea
is_éard+Cop+Pres+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:is_éard	 #;	! is éard
is_é+Cop+Pres+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg+Masc:is_é	#;	! is é
is_é+Cop+Pres+Dep+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg+Masc:gurb_é	#;	! gurb é
is_í+Cop+Pres+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg+Fem:is_í	#;	! is í
is_iad+Cop+Pres+Pron+Pers+3P+Pl:is_iad	#;	! is iad
is_é+Cop+Past+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg+Masc:ba_é	#;	! ba é
is_í+Cop+Past+Pron+Pers+3P+Sg+Fem:ba_í	#;	! ba í
is_iomaí+Cop+Pres+Adj+Base:is_iomaí	#;	! is iomaí
is_ionann+Cop+Pres+Adj+Base:is_ionann	#;	! is ionann
is_maith+Cop+Pres+Adj+Comp:gurbh_fhearr	#;	! gurbh fhearr
is_maith+Cop+Past+Rel+Adj+Comp:ab_fhearr	#;	! ab fhearr
is_fiú+Cop+Pres+Noun+Com+Masc+Sg:gurbh_fhiú	#;
is_féidir+Cop+Past+Rel+Subst+Noun+Sg+Len:ab_fhéidir	#;
is_éigean+Cop+Pres+RelInd+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:arbh_éigean	#;
!!cén_t-ainm+Cop+Q+Art+Noun+Com+Masc+Sg:Cén_t-ainm	#;
is_as+Cop+Past+Prep+Simp:ba_as	#;	! 

cad_é+Cop+Pro+Q:cad_é		#;	! caidé, goidé
cá_as+Adv+Q+Prep+Simp:cá_as	#;	! 
cá_ar+Adv+Q+Prep+Simp:cá_ar	#;	! 

arna_mhárach+Prep+Cmpd+Subst+Noun+Sg:arna_mhárach	#;
!!chun_an+Prep+Simp+Art+Sg+Def:chun_an	#;
!!chun_na+Prep+Simp+Art+Pl+Def:chun_na	#;
i_measc+Prep+Simp+Noun+Com+Masc+Sg:i_measc	#;

!!cé_gur+Conj+Subord+Cop+Pres+Dep:cé_gur	#;
!!cé_is+Conj+Subord+Cop+Pres+Dep:cé_is	#;
        

! PHRASAL COMPOUNDS
! First word is head of phrase 

!!bord_cinn+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg_Len:bhord_cinn	#;
!!bád_abhann+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:bád_abhann	#;
!!beacán_bearaigh+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:beacán_bearaigh	#;
!!bó_bainne+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:bó_bainne	#;
!!bean_tí+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:bean_tí	#;
!!bolg_le_gréin+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:bolg_le_gréin	#;
!!caitheamh_aimsire+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:caitheamh_aimsire	#;
!!ceann_feadhna+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ceann_feadhna	#;
!!ceann_feadhna+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Ecl:gceann_feadhna	#;
!!ceann_tuí+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ceann_tuí	#;
!!cathaoir_láimhe+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg+Len:chathaoir_láimhe	#;
!!cheirt_seo+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg+Det+Dem+Len:cheirt_seo	#;
!!cois_sin+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg+Det+Dem+Len:chois_sin	#;
!!corda_glas+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Len:chorda_glas	#;
!!Cú_Chulainn+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Len:Chú_Chulainn	#;
!!Cú_Chulainn+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Ecl:gCú_Chulainn	#;

!!ciolar_chiot+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ciolar_chiot	#;
!!cionn_is+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Conj+Coord:cionn_is	#;
!!cloch_sneachta+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:cloch_sneachta	#;
cosa_in_airde+Noun+Fem+Com+Pl:cosa_in_airde	#;

!!croitheadh_inchinne+Verbal+Noun+VTI:croitheadh_inchinne	#;
!!culaith_uisce+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:culaith_uisce	#;
!!cuma_liom+Adj+Base:cuma_liom	#;
!!lán_mara+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:lán_mara	#;
!!leabhar_an_tsiúil+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:leabhar_an_tsiúil	#;
!!leath_bealaigh+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:leath_bealaigh	#;
!!lionn_dubh+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:lionn_dubh	#;
!!mac_tíre+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:mac_tíre	#;
!!cac_bó+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:cac_bó	#;
meán_lae+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:meán_lae	#;
meán_lae+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Len:mheán_lae	#;
meán_oíche+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:meán_oíche	#;
meán_oíche+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Len:mheán_oíche	#;
!!láimhe_láidre+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:láimhe_láidre	#;
!!aon_mheall+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Ecl:n-aon_mheall	#;
!!gach_aon+Det+Qty+Def+Ecl:ngach_aon	#;
!!gach_aon+Det+Qty+Def:gach_aon	#;
!!gan_fhios+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:gan_fhios	#;
!!gan_fhios+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Ecl:ngan_fhios	#;
!!gúngaí_beaga+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl+Ecl:ngúngaí_beaga	#;
!!nós_chuma_liom+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:nós_chuma_liom	#;
!!peann_luaidhe+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:peann_luaidhe	#;
!!ré_dhorcha+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:ré_dhorcha	#;
!!rosc_catha+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:rosc_catha	#;
!!saor_adhmaid+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:saor_adhmaid	#;
!!scáthanna_solais+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:scáthanna_solais	#;
!!scáth_fearthainne+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:scáth_fearthainne	#;
!!scáth_gréine+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:scáth_gréine	#;
!!séideáin_sealáin+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:séideáin_sealáin	#;
!!sliogán_tine+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:sliogán_tine	#;
!!stól_campa+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:stól_campa	#;
!!stól_lúbtha+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:stól_lúbtha	#;
!!támhach_táisc+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:támhach_táisc	#;
!!támhach_táisc+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Len:thámhach_táisc	#;
!!taobh_istigh+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:taobh_istigh	#;
!!aon_fhear+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:aon_fhear	#;
!!aon_fhear+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+DefArt:t-aon_fhear	#;
!!aon_ghnó+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:aon_ghnó	#;
!!aon_guth+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:aon_ghuth	#;
!!aon_rud+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:aon_rud	#;
!!aon_scraith+Num+Card+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:aon_scraith	#;
!!aon_smaoineamh+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:aon_smaoineamh	#;
!!aon_turas+Num+Card+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:aon_turas	#;
!!tír_mór+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:tír_mór	#;
!!thamhach_táisc+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:thamhach_táisc	#;
!!trioc_tosaithe+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:trioc_tosaithe	#;
!!seomra_stáit+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+DefArt:tseomra_stáit	#;
!!uisce_beatha+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:uisce_beatha	#;
!!buíon_cheoil+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Len:bhuíon_cheoil	#;

!!seo_againne+Det+Dem+Pron+Prep+1P+Pl+Emph:seo_againne	#;
!!seo_agamsa+Det+Dem+Pron+Prep+1P+Sg+Emph:seo_agamsa	#;
!!seo_aicise+Det+Dem+Pron+Prep+3P+Sg+Fem+Emph:seo_aicise	#;

!!anoir_aduaidh+Adv+Dir:anoir_aduaidh	#;
!!soir_ó_thuaidh+Adv+Dir:soir_ó_thuaidh	#;
!!thiar_thuaidh+Adv+Dir:Thiar_Thuaidh	#;

!!gabh_anseo+Verb+VTI+Imper+2P+Sg+Adv+Loc:gabh_anseo	#;
!!ga_seá+Subst+Noun+Sg:ga_seá	#;
!!do+Prep+Simp+Det+Poss+2P+Sg:do_do	#;
!!éadach_ola+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:éadach_ola	#;
!!faoi_mo+Prep+Simp+Det+Poss+1P+Sg:faoi_mo	#;
!!cliabhán_rothaí+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Ecl:gcliabhán_rothaí	#;
!!gléas_imirce+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+Len:Ghléas_Imirce	#;
!!innill_tógála+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:innill_tógála	#;


!!abair+Verb+VTI+Vow+Cond:a_déarfadh	#;
!!abair+Verb+VTI+Vow+PresInd+Rel:a_deir	#;
!!abair+Verb+VTI+Vow+PresInd+1P+Sg+Rel:a_deirim	#;
!!abair+Verb+VTI+Vow+PastImp+Rel:a_deireadh	#;
!!abair+Verb+VTI+Vow+PastImp+Auto:a_deirtí	#;
!!abair+Verb+VTI+Vow+PastInd:a_dúirt	#;
!!feic+Verb+VTI+PresInd+Auto+Rel+Len:a_fheictear	#;
!!feic+Verb+VTI+PresInd+Rel+Len:a_fheiceann	#;
!!arsa_an+Verb+PastInd+Art+Sg+Def:arsa_an	#;


aithris+Verb+VTI+Vow+FutInd+1P+Sg:aithriseoidh_mé	#;	! Aithriseóchad 
faigh+Verb+VT+PastInd+1P+Sg+Ecl:bhfuair_mé			! bhfuaras 
bí+Verb+VI+PastInd+1P+Sg:bhí_mé	#;				! bhíos => bhí_mé
bí+Verb+VI+PastInd+1P+Sg+Emph:bhí_mise	#;			! bhíos-sa => bhí_mise
cuimhnigh+Verb+VTI+FutInd+1P+Sg:cuimhneoidh_mé	#;		! Cuimhneochad => Cuimhneoidh_mé
!! do_bhíos => bhí_mé
caith+Verb+VTI+PastInd+1P+Sg+Len:chaith_mé	#;		! do_chaitheas => chaith_mé
cuir+Verb+VTI+PastInd+1P+Sg+Len:chuir_mé	#;		! do_chuireas => chuir_mé
gearr+Verb+VTI+PastInd+1P+Sg+Len:ghearr_mé	#;		! do_ghearras => ghearr_mé
rith+Verb+VTI+PastInd+1P+Sg+Len:rith_mé	#;			! Do_ritheas => Rith_mé
tar+Verb+VTI+PastInd+1P+Sg+Len:tháinig_mé	#;		! dtánag => tháinig_mé
!! thánag => tháinig_mé
faigh+Verb+VT+PastInd+1P+Sg+Ecl:bhfuair_mé	#;		! fuaras => bhfuair_mé
imigh+Verb+VI+FutInd+1P+Sg:imeoidh_mé	#;			! Imeóchad => Imeoidh_mé
léigh+Verb+VTI+PastInd+1P+Sg:léigh_mé	#;			! léas => léigh_mé
bí+Verb+VI+PastInd+Dep+1P+Sg:raibh_mé	#; 			! rabhas => raibh_mé
tabhair+Verb+VD+FutInd+1P+Sg:tabharfaidh_mé #; 			! tiubhrad => tabharfaidh_mé
!! dtiubhrad => tabharfaidh_mé
fuirigh+Verb+VTI+FutInd+1P+Sg:fuireoidh_mé #; 			! fhuireochad => fuireoidh_mé
faigh+Verb+VT+PastInd+1P+Sg:fuair_mé	#;			! fuaras => fuair_mé
inis+Verb+VT+FutInd+1P+Sg:inseoidh_mé #; 			! n-innseochad => inseoidh_mé

!!!! ADD THESE ITEMS !!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!feic+Verb+VTI+FutInd+2P+Sg:feicfidh_tú	#;		! chífir => feicfidh_tú
!!!bí+Verb+VI+PresInd+2P+Sg+Rel:atá_tú	#;		! ataoi => atá_tú
!!!feic+Verb+VTI+PresFut+2P+Sg+Ecl:bhfeicfidh_tú	#;	! bhfeicfir => bhfeicfidh_tú
!!!caith+Verb+VTI+FutInd+2P+Sg:caithfidh_tú	#;	! caithfir => caithfidh_tú
!!!iarr+Verb+VT+Vow+FutInd+2P+Sg:iarrfidh_tú	#;	! d'iarrfair => iarrfaidh_tú
!!!faigh+Verb+VT+FutInd+2P+Sg:gheobhaidh_tú	#;	! gheóbhair => gheobhaidh_tú
!!!lig+Verb+VTI+FutInd+2P+Sg:ligfidh_tú	#;		! leigfir => ligfidh_tú
!!!téigh+Verb+VTI+FutInd+2P+Sg:rachaidh_tú	#;		! raghair => rachaidh_tú
!!!bí+Verb+VI+PresInd+2P+Sg:tá_tú	#;			! taoi => tá_tú
!!!tar+Verb+VI+FutInd+2P+Sg:tiocfaidh_tú	#;		! tiocfair => tiocfaidh_tú
!!!bí+Verb+VI+PresInd+2P+Pl:tá_sibh	#;		! táthaoi => tá sibh
!!!tabhair+Verb+VD+PresInd+3P+Pl:tugann_siad	#;	! tugaid => tugann siad

!! PLACENAMES
!        "Abhainn_Dhearg" Guess Unknown Noun ^Abhainn-Dhearg^
!        "An_Astráil" Guess Unknown Noun ^Australia^
!        "Ard_Mhacha" Guess Unknown Noun ^Árdmhacha^
!        "Dhún_na_nGall" Guess Unknown Noun ^Dhúnna-nGall^
!        "Dún_Dá_Leath_Ghlas" Guess Unknown Noun ^Dún-Dá-Leath-Ghlas^
!        "Eas_Aodha_Rua" Guess Unknown Noun ^Eas-Aodh-Ruaidh^
!        "Gleann_Dá_Loch" Guess Unknown Noun ^Gleann-DáLoch^
!        "Hong_Cong" Guess Unknown Noun ^Hong-Kong^

!        "mBaile_an_Easa" Guess Unknown Noun ^mBaile-an-Easa^
!        "mBaile_Átha_Cliath" Guess Unknown Noun ^mBaile-Átha-Cliath^
!     	"Mhaigh_Eo" Guess Unknown Noun ^Mhuigheo^
!	Mhín_an_Chorraigh" Guess Unknown Noun ^Mhín-an-Churraigh^
!        "Mhín_an_Úcaire" Guess Unknown Noun ^Mhín-an-Úcaire^
!        "Thír_Chonaill" Guess Unknown Noun ^Thírchonaill^
!        "Uíbh_Fhailí" Guess Unknown Noun ^Ua bhFáilghe^
!************************************************************************************
